dictionaries/ro-ro.aff
SFX A Y 71
SFX A   Äƒ     a       Äƒ                  s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   Äƒ     o       Äƒ
SFX A   Äƒ     ei      [^s]Äƒ              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   Äƒ     e       [^s]Äƒ              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   Äƒ     ele     [^s]Äƒ              s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   Äƒ     elor    [^s]Äƒ              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   Äƒ     ei      [^a]sÄƒ             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   Äƒ     e       [^a]sÄƒ             s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   Äƒ     ele     [^a]sÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   Äƒ     elor    [^a]sÄƒ            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   Äƒ     ei      [^e]asÄƒ           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   Äƒ     e       [^e]asÄƒ           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   Äƒ     ele     [^e]asÄƒ          s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   Äƒ     elor    [^e]asÄƒ           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   asÄƒ   sei     easÄƒ       s.f.sg.dat
SFX A   asÄƒ   se      easÄƒ       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   asÄƒ   sele    easÄƒ       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   asÄƒ   selor   easÄƒ       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     a       [^i]e          s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   0     a-i       [^i]e
SFX A   e     a       ie             s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   e     a-i       ie
SFX A   are   Äƒrii    [^oi]are       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   are   Äƒri     [^oi]are       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   are   Äƒrile   [^oi]are      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   are   Äƒrilor  [^oi]are      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   are   erii    iare       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   are   eri     iare       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   are   erile   iare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   are   erilor  iare       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   oare     orii       oare        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   oare     ori      oare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   oare     oarele      oare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   oare     orilor    oare       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     ii      ere            s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     i       ere            s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     ere            s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    ere            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     ii      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     i       [iu]ne       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     [iu]ne      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    [iu]ne      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     i       [^e]ie      s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     i       ie           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     [^e]ie      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    [^e]ie      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     0       eie      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     le      eie      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     lor     eie      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   ate   ÄƒÈ›ii    ate       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   ate   ÄƒÈ›i     ate       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ate   ÄƒÈ›ile   ate       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ate   ÄƒÈ›ilor  ate       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     ua      a         s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   0     lei     [^e]a        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   0     le      [^e]a        s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   0     lele    [^e]a        s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   0     lelor   [^e]a         s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   a     lei     ea          s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   a     le      ea          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   a     lele    ea          s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   a     lelor   ea          s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     eo   ime
SFX A   e     i   ime       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ii   ime       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     ile   ime      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor   ime     s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     i   lme        s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ii   lme        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     ile   lme      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor   lme      s.f.pl.dat.
#end********************************************************************************


#********************************************************************************
# neutre: abajur/abajurui (C) sau È™ablon/È™abloane (MP)
SFX C Y 14
SFX C 0 u  [^u]
SFX C 0 u-i  [^u]
SFX C 0 ul  [^u]            s.n. sg. art.
SFX C 0 uri  [^u]           s.n. pl. neart.
SFX C 0 urile  [^u]         s.n. pl. art.
SFX C 0 urilor  [^u]        s.n. pl. dat.
SFX C 0 ului  [^u]          s.n. sg. dat.
SFX C 0 ule  [^u]
SFX C 0 l u                  s.n. sg. art.
SFX C 0 ri u                  s.n. pl. neart.
SFX C 0 rile u               s.n. pl. art.
SFX C 0 rilor u             s.n. pl. dat.
SFX C 0 lui u               s.n. sg. dat.
SFX C 0 le u

SFX c Y 8
SFX c 0 u  [^u]
SFX c 0 u-i  [^u]
SFX c 0 ul  [^u]            s.n. sg. art.
SFX c 0 ului  [^u]          s.n. sg. dat.
SFX c 0 ule  [^u]
SFX c 0 l u                  s.n. sg. art.
SFX c 0 lui u               s.n. sg. dat.
SFX c 0 le u



SFX M Y 10
SFX M 0 u .
SFX M 0 ul .               s.n.sg.art.
SFX M 0 ului .             s.n.sg.dat.
SFX M 0 ule .
SFX M 0 e [^n]             s.n.pl.neart.
SFX M 0 ele [^n]           s.n.pl.art.
SFX M 0 elor [^n]          s.n.pl.dat.
SFX M on oane on            s.n.pl.neart.
SFX M on oanele on          s.n.pl.art.
SFX M on oanelor on         s.n.pl.dat.

SFX P Y 55
SFX P   0     u      [^u]
SFX P   0     u-i      [^u]
SFX P   0     ul      [^u]            s.n.sg.art.
SFX P   0     ului    [^u]            s.n.sg.dat.
SFX P   0     ule    [^u]
SFX P   0     e       [^dginprut]    s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^dginprut]    s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^dginprut]    s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^o][dg]         s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^o][dg]        s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^o][dg]         s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^n]t             s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^n]t             s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^n]t             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^Ã¢]nt            s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^Ã¢]nt           s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^Ã¢]nt           s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   Ã¢nt   inte    Ã¢nt              s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   Ã¢nt   intele  Ã¢nt             s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   Ã¢nt   intelor Ã¢nt             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   g     age     og              s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   g     agele   og             s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   g     agelor  og             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   d     ade     od              s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   d     adele   od              s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   d     adelor  od              s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   p     ape     op               s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   p     apele   op               s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   p     apelor  op               s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   i      aie     oi                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   i      aiele     oi              s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   i      aielor     oi             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^o]r             s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^o]r             s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^o]r             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   i     e       ci                  s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   i     ele     ci                  s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   i     elor    ci                  s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   r     are     or                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   r     arele   or                 s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   r     arelor  or                 s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   n     ane     on                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   n     anele   on                 s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   n     anelor  on                 s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^o]n                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^o]n                 s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^o]n                 s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     l       u                        s.n.sg.art.
SFX P   0     lui     u                        s.n.sg.dat.
SFX P   u     i       iu                        s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   u     ile     iu                       s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   u     ilor    iu                       s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   u     e       [er]u                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   u     ele     [er]u                 s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   u     elor    [er]u                 s.n.pl.dat.

#end********************************************************************************

#********************************************************************************
# adjective
SFX D Y 12
SFX D 0 u .
SFX D 0 ul .
SFX D 0 ule .
SFX D 0 ului .
SFX D 0 i .
SFX D 0 ii .
SFX D 0 ilor .
SFX D 0 a .
SFX D 0 Äƒ .
SFX D 0 e .
SFX D 0 ele .
SFX D 0 elor .
PFX D Y 1
PFX D 0 ne .
