dictionaries/ro-ro.dic
achizitiv/D
adhortativ/D
aer/P
aeroproiector/c
afecÈ›ie/A
afet/C
alevinaj/c
alfatron/M
alineat/P
amendativ/D
amoc/C
amÄƒrÄƒluÈ›Äƒ/A
analitism/c
ancombrament/P
animal/M
aniversativ/D
antifascism/c
antropomorfism/c
aparataj/P
apetitiv/D
apÄƒsatÄƒ/A
arhegon/M
arierbec/C
arivism/c
asediu/P
asertiv/D
atentiv/D
audiofon/M
austru/c
autodezvoltare/A
autoritarism/P
autoritativ/D
aviofon/M
avÃ¢nt/C
balast/c
balcon/M
bantustan/P
barbiÈ™on/M
bason/M
baton/M
bazar/C
berjerÄƒ/A
beton/M
bidon/M
big/P
bimetalism/c
blam/C
bluzon/M
borcÄƒnel/P
borhot/c
boston/C
breton/M
brumÄƒrea/A
bubuit/c
buldozer/P
bulon/M
bust/C
cacofonism/P
cafeism/c
calitativ/D
calorie/A
canion/M
cantaridism/c
capital/C
capitol/P
carst/c
casetofon/M
castru/P
celestÄƒ/A
celibat/c
cembalo/C
cercopitecid/P
cheiaj/c
chestionar/M
chiÈ™toc/C
cimitir/P
cinemascop/c
ciuditÄƒ/A
claxon/P
clon/c
clonc/C
cocon/M
coercitiv/D
colier/P
colofoniu/c
comentativ/D
comercializare/A
comizerativ/D
comperaj/M
compilativ/D
compresiv/D
conativ/D
condens/C
confesiv/D
conformator/P
consecutiv/D
conservatorism/c
constativ/D
contaminantÄƒ/A
contrarotativ/D
coordonativ/D
copitat/P
cosmopolitism/c
costeliv/D
coÈ™/C
coÈ™averaj/M
crestÄƒ/A
criostat/P
crupon/M
curativ/D
cvintilion/M
cÄƒciuloi/P
dacrioree/A
daltonism/c
decacord/C
declamativ/D
decorativ/D
dedurizator/P
definitiv/D
deliricizare/A
demorfism/c
deopotriv/D
desfÄƒcut/P
desfÄƒcutÄƒ/A
desicativ/D
dicton/M
diferenÈ›iativ/D
dig/C
dimensiune/A
dimorfism/c
directiv/D
disuasiv/D
docÄƒraÈ™/P
donativ/D
dubas/C
dumicatÄƒ/A
dupÄƒit/c
ebuliometru/P
ecuson/M
elativ/D
electroporÈ›elan/c
element/P
eneolitic/c
engolpion/M
engramÄƒ/A
epitaf/C
epiteliu/P
ergativ/D
eternit/c
excursiv/D
exigentÄƒ/A
experiment/P
expresiv/D
eÈ™alon/M
fabianism/c
fazitron/M
feliuÈ™ag/C
fericitare/A
fermoar/P
festivism/c
flogopit/c
fluier/P
flux/C
foileton/M
franÈ™Äƒ/A
front/c
furtiÈ™ag/C
fÄƒcut/P
gabion/M
geret/c
germanofilÄƒ/A
ghinion/M
ghinÈ›/C
globalism/P
godavil/C
gramofon/M
grus/c
guvernativ/D
gÃ¢citÄƒ/A
gÄƒinaÈ›/C
hanap/P
hem/C
hexagon/M
hidrocortizon/c
hipertimie/A
host/C
hural/P
ido/c
imersiune/A
import/C
impresiv/D
inclusiv/D
inexigibilÄƒ/A
inspectiv/D
interdictiv/D
interfon/M
intervertebralÄƒ/A
intestin/P
invectiv/D
iod/c
jeb/C
jeton/M
juisatÄƒ/A
laicism/c
landÈ™aft/C
legÄƒnuÈ™/P
letcon/M
lingotierÄƒ/A
linon/C
lucrativ/D
luddism/c
machiaverlÃ¢c/C
macroseism/P
magnetofon/M
malarÄƒ/A
marxism/c
mascaron/M
meleu/C
meristem/P
meritalÄƒ/A
microfon/M
milenarism/c
milieu/C
minifoileton/M
minutar/P
mochetatÄƒ/A
monofon/M
morosliv/D
motociclism/c
motocros/C
muschet/P
mustrare/A
mÄƒsliniÈ™/C
necumpÄƒnitÄƒ/A
nefron/M
neocapitalism/c
netrunchiatÄƒ/A
notes/C
oberliht/c
obor/P
observativ/D
obstruare/A
olm/C
onomasticon/M
orlon/c
oronimic/P
oscilÄƒ/A
otofon/M
palium/C
parapod/P
pardon/c
particularÄƒ/A
patvagon/M
paÈ™alÃ¢c/C
pehliv/D
peron/M
perperit/c
personagiu/P
petardÄƒ/A
pic/C
piezorezistiv/D
piton/M
plic/C
pliculeÈ›/P
ploton/M
pluritonalism/c
plÄƒcintÄƒ/A
ponton/M
port/C
portofel/P
preambalare/A
preclasicism/c
predictiv/D
prezentativ/D
prisosinÈ›Äƒ/A
privaz/C
prizon/M
proconsulat/P
profilactiv/D
prurigo/c
puhavÄƒ/A
punitiv/D
pustiu/C
pÃ¢rÃ¢iaÈ™/P
radiosimpozion/M
rai/C
ramazan/c
raritate/A
reancoratÄƒ/A
rebihindisitÄƒ/A
recif/P
recoparticipatÄƒ/A
recreditiv/D
rediluare/A
refractiv/D
regafare/A
reliefare/A
reniÈ™/C
reoropsitÄƒ/A
repetitiv/D
repÄƒstrare/A
resecurizatÄƒ/A
restaurativ/D
reverenÈ›Äƒ/A
reÃ®nlÄƒnÈ›uitÄƒ/A
roc/C
rodan/P
romanism/c
rumbatron/M
rÄƒsad/C
sanguinÄƒ/A
scandal/C
sediu/P
semiinstinctiv/D
seminomadism/c
set/C
sezon/M
sincrofazotron/M
sociocognitiv/D
sold/C
stalactit/P
strÄƒpezitÄƒ/A
stuc/C
subminativ/D
sufism/c
superorticon/M
supertanc/C
supletiv/D
tahigraf/P
talmud/C
tecnetron/M
teletax/c
tempestiv/D
termenvox/C
termosifon/M
termosifon/P
tipologie/A
tirfon/M
tort/C
transsiberian/c
travaliu/P
trigon/M
tristih/C
tÄƒlgerel/P
tÄƒlhÄƒrÄƒÈ™ug/C
unionism/c
ureteralÄƒ/A
vagon/M
verificativ/D
vesmÃ¢nt/P
videotelefon/M
vitellus/c
vraf/C
xenolit/P
zburÄƒtoare/A
zinc/c
Ã®nmÄƒrmuritÄƒ/A
Ã®nsurat/P
Ã®ntors/C
È™ablon/M
È™pighel/c
È™trand/C
È›evar/P
